Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.080

Tax preference performance statements—Task force created.

(1) The legislative auditor, with the assistance of a task force, must make recommendations on the appropriate data and metrics that should be included in tax preference performance statements to evaluate new tax preferences, as provided under RCW 82.32.808.

(2)(a) The task force is comprised of five members: (i) One person from the department of revenue; (ii) one person from an association representing Washington businesses; (iii) one person from the office of financial management; (iv) the legislative auditor or a designee of the legislative auditor; and (v) an economist with substantial experience in state taxes.

(b) The task force must choose its chair from among its membership.

(3) By January 1, 2014, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the legislative auditor must submit a report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature the findings and recommendations of the task force.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1703.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 82.04.43393.